Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 6A Nursing Home Provider Fee

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2003, p. 435, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Nursing Home Provider Fee Act.’ ”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Indigent care trust fund-nursing home provider fee, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Medical Assistance, Chapter 350-7.

31-8-161.
Legislative authority.

This article is passed pursuant to the authority of Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(i) of the Constitution.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-161

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 435, § 2.

31-8-162.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Department” means the Department of Community Health created by Chapter 2 of this title.

“Medically indigent” means a person who meets the state-wide standards of indigency adopted by the department.

“Nursing home” means a freestanding facility or distinct part or unit of a hospital required to be licensed or permitted as a nursing home under the provisions of Chapter 7 of this title which is not owned or operated by the state or federal government.

“Nursing home that disproportionately serves the medically indigent” means a nursing home for which the patient days attributable to medically indigent residents account for more than 15 percent of the nursing home’s total patient days during a 12 month period. For purposes of this computation, medicare program patient days shall not be included in the nursing home’s total patient days.

“Patient day” means a day of care provided to an individual resident of a nursing home by the nursing home. A patient day includes the date of admission but does not include the date of discharge, unless the dates of admission and discharge occur on the same day.

“Provider fee” means the fee imposed pursuant to this article for the privilege of operating a nursing home.

“Segregated account” means an account for the dedication and deposit of provider fees which is established within the Indigent Care Trust Fund created pursuant to Code Section 31-8-152.

“State plan” means all documentation submitted by the commissioner of the Department of Community Health on behalf of the department to and for approval by the United States secretary of health and human services, pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act.

“Trust fund” means the Indigent Care Trust Fund created pursuant to Code Section 31-8-152.

“Waiver” means a waiver of the uniform tax requirement for permissible health care related taxes, as provided in 42 C.F.R. Section 433.68(e)(2)(i) and (ii).

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-162

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 435, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-8/HB 228.

U.S. Code.

Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 1396

et seq.

31-8-163.
Segregated account of revenues raised through provider fees.

There is established within the trust fund a segregated account for revenues raised through the imposition of the provider fee. All revenues raised through provider fees shall be credited to the segregated account within the trust fund and shall be invested in the same manner as authorized for investing other moneys in the state treasury. Contributions and transfers to the trust fund pursuant to Code Sections 31-8-153 and 31-8-153.1 shall not be deposited into the segregated account.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-163

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 435, § 2.

31-8-164.
Provider fee based on patient day; quarterly payment required.

Each nursing home shall be assessed a provider fee with respect to each patient day for the preceding quarter, excluding medicare program patient days. The provider fee shall be assessed uniformly upon all nursing homes, except as provided in Code Section 31-8-168. The aggregate provider fees imposed under this article shall not exceed the maximum amount that may be assessed pursuant to the percentage limitation of the first prong of the test for an indirect guarantee set out in 42 C.F.R. Section 433.68(f)(3)(i).

The provider fee shall be paid quarterly by each nursing home to the department. A nursing home shall calculate and report the provider fee due upon a form prepared by the department and submit therewith payment of the provider fee no later than the thirtieth day following the end of each calendar quarter. The initial provider fee report shall be filed and the initial payment of the provider fee shall be submitted no later than July 30, 2003. A nursing home shall calculate and report the initial provider fee using information about its patient days for the quarter ending June 30, 2003.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-164

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 435, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 204, § 1/HB 1308.

31-8-165.
Use of segregated account funds; form for reporting provider fee; maintenance of records; inaccurate payments; penalty for failing to pay.

The department shall collect the provider fees imposed pursuant to Code Section 31-8-164. All revenues raised pursuant to this article shall be deposited into the segregated account. Such funds shall be dedicated and used for the sole purpose of obtaining federal financial participation for medical assistance payments to nursing homes that disproportionately serve the medically indigent.

The department shall prepare and distribute a form upon which a nursing home shall calculate and report to the department the provider fee.

Each nursing home shall keep and preserve for a period of three years such books and records as may be necessary to determine the amount for which it is liable under this article. The department shall have the authority to inspect and copy the records of a nursing home for purposes of auditing the calculation of the provider fee. All information obtained by the department pursuant to this article shall be confidential and shall not constitute a public record.

In the event that the department determines that a nursing home has underpaid or overpaid the provider fee, the department shall notify the nursing home of the balance of the provider fee or refund that is due. Such payment or refund shall be due within 30 days of the department’s notice.

Any nursing home that fails to pay the provider fee pursuant to this article within the time required by this article shall pay, in addition to the outstanding provider fee, a 6 percent penalty for each month or fraction thereof that the payment is overdue. If a provider fee has not been received by the department by the last day of the month, the department shall withhold an amount equal to the provider fee and penalty owed from any medical assistance payment due such nursing home under the Medicaid program. The provider fee levied by this article shall constitute a debt due the state and may be collected by civil action and the filing of tax liens in addition to such methods provided for in this article. Any penalty that accrues pursuant to this subsection shall be credited to the segregated account.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-165

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 435, § 2.

31-8-166.
General Assembly appropriations of segregated funds; match to federal funds; no lapsing at end of fiscal year.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the General Assembly is authorized to appropriate as state funds to the department for use in any fiscal year all revenues dedicated and deposited into the segregated account. Such appropriations shall be made for the sole purpose of obtaining federal financial participation in the provision of support to nursing homes that disproportionately serve the medically indigent. Any appropriation from the segregated account for any purpose other than medical assistance payments to nursing homes shall be void.

Revenues appropriated to the department pursuant to this Code section shall be used to match federal funds that are available for the purpose for which such trust funds have been appropriated.

Appropriations from the segregated account to the department shall not lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-166

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 435, § 2.

31-8-167.
Annual report by department to General Assembly.

The department shall report annually to the General Assembly on its use of revenues deposited into the segregated account and appropriated to the department pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-167

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 435, § 2.

31-8-168.
Request for waiver from United States Department of Health and Human Services.

No later than July 1, 2003, the department shall prepare and submit to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health and Human Services a request for approval of a waiver pursuant to 42 C.F.R. Section 433.68(e) of the uniform fee requirement. Upon approval of such waiver, the department shall take action to reduce the provider fee imposed pursuant to Code Section 31-8-164 allowed by such waiver for those providers who qualify for such reduction.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-168

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 435, § 2.

31-8-169.
Application of the Medical Assistance Act of 1977.

Except where inconsistent with this article, the provisions of Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49, the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977,” shall apply to the department in carrying out the purposes of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-169

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 435, § 2.